Massachusetts, session 194th, H3208.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. General Laws Amendment.
Chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section
after Section 34:
Section 35. Sales Tax on Digital Advertising Services.
(a) Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
"Digital advertising services," the sale or purchase of advertising space through digital
interfaces, including websites, mobile applications, and other internet-connected platforms.
"Purchaser," any individual, business, or entity paying for digital advertising services to
target users located within the Commonwealth.
of 5

"Vendor," any individual, business, or entity providing digital advertising services to
purchasers targeting users located within the Commonwealth.
"Taxable transaction," the sale of digital advertising services where the target audience is
determined to be located within the Commonwealth, based on the user’s Internet Protocol (IP)
address, geolocation data, or another reasonable method for determining location.
(b) Imposition of Tax.
A sales tax is hereby imposed on the purchase of digital advertising services targeting
users located within the Commonwealth.
The tax rate shall be 6.25% of the gross sales price of the digital advertising service.
The tax shall be collected by the vendor at the time of the sale and remitted to the
Department of Revenue in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
Transactions exempt from the sales tax under Chapter 64H, Section 6 shall also be
exempt from this tax.
Vendors with gross annual digital advertising sales below $2,500,000 targeting users in
the Commonwealth shall be exempt from this tax.
SECTION 2. Allocation of Revenues.
(a) Administrative Costs.
Up to 5% of the total revenue collected under this section shall be allocated for
administrative costs associated with implementing, enforcing, and managing grant programs.
This allocation shall be distributed as follows:
of 5

The Department of Revenue may retain 1% for administering and enforcing the digital
advertising tax.
Each administering agency—Massachusetts Department of Telecommunications and
Cable, Massachusetts Department of Public Health (DPH), and Massachusetts Department of
Elementary and Secondary Education (DESE)—shall receive 1.33% each to manage their
respective grant programs, including technical assistance and program oversight.
(b) Delayed Appropriation.
The disbursement of grant funds shall be delayed by up to one fiscal year after the start of
revenue collection to ensure sufficient funds are accrued for program stability and initial
administrative setup.
During this period, the Department of Revenue shall establish necessary regulations,
systems, and interagency coordination frameworks to facilitate effective program
implementation.
(c) Allocation of Program Funds.
After accounting for administrative costs, the remaining 95% of the revenue shall be
allocated equally among the following three categories, with each receiving exactly one-third
(33.33%) of the total.
Local Access Television Programs:
Administered by the Massachusetts Department of Telecommunications and Cable,
grants shall support:
of 5

Increasing community media programming.
Enhancing production quality and digital capabilities.
Expanding access to diverse and inclusive programming.
Public Education Campaigns:
Administered by the Massachusetts Department of Public Health (DPH), grants shall
fund:
Evidence-based resources for parents, educators, and students.
Workshops and seminars in schools and communities.
Digital and print materials promoting mental health and safe social media use.
Research on Artificial Intelligence in Education:
Administered by the Massachusetts Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
(DESE), grants shall fund:
AI tools designed to address diverse learning needs.
Partnerships between public schools and research institutions.
Pilot programs for innovative technologies that improve learning outcomes.
(d) Technical Assistance.
of 5

Each agency shall allocate a portion of its administrative funding to provide technical
assistance to grant applicants, with an emphasis on supporting small organizations, underserved
communities, and rural areas.
(e) Utilization and Reallocation of Funds.
Allocated program funds must be utilized within two (2) years of disbursement.
Any unused program funds shall revert to the general allocation pool for redistribution in
subsequent years.
(f) Reporting Surplus Administrative Funds.
At the end of each fiscal year, each agency shall submit a report to the Department of
Revenue detailing how administrative funds were utilized. Any unspent administrative funds
shall be returned to the general allocation pool for redistribution.
SECTION 3. Effective Date.
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027, with grant disbursements beginning no
earlier than January 1, 2028.
of 5